Utah statutes.
54-9-107.   Disposition of proceeds and revenues.
All money belonging to a public power entity in connection with common
facilities, including the proceeds of the sale of bonds and the revenues
arising from the operation of common facilities:
(1)  may be deposited in a bank or trust company doing business within or
without the state; and
(2)  shall be accounted for and disbursed in accordance with applicable law
and the provisions of the resolution or indenture authorizing the issuance of
the bonds.
